src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection for Mansi
! ----------------

!! Stems ending in V
!! # N01 = stem ending in (а|о|у|э|а̄|о̄|ӯ|э̄|я|ё|ю|е|я̄|ё̄|ю̄|е̄)
!! # N02 = stem ending in (и|ы|ӣ|ы̄)

!! Stems ending in C
!! # N13 = stem ending in (г|ӈ|в|к|кв|м|п|р|х)
!! # N14 = stem ending in (ль|нь|ть)
!! # N16 = stem ending in (й)
!! # N17 = stem ending in (б|д|ф|ц|ч|ш|з|ж)
!! # N18 = stem ending in (бь|дь|фь|ць|чь|шь|зь|жь|рь)
!! # N19 = stem ending in (щ)

!! Stems ending in CC
!! # N23 = stem ending in C and (г|ӈ|в|к|кв|м|п|р|х)
!! # N24 = stem ending in C and (л|н|т|с)
!! # N25 = stem ending in C and (ль|нь|ть)
!! # N26 = stem ending in C and (й)
!! # N27 = stem ending in C and (б|д|ф|ц|ч|ш|з|ж)
!! # N28 = stem ending in C and (бь|дь|фь|ць|чь|шь|зь|жь|рь)
!! # N29 = stem ending in C and (щ)

!! Stems ending in CCC
!! # N33 = stem ending in CC and (г|ӈ|в|к|кв|м|п|р|х)
!! # N34 = stem ending in CC and (л|н|т|с)
!! # N35 = stem ending in CC and (ль|нь|ть)
!! # N36 = stem ending in CC and (й)
!! # N37 = stem ending in CC and (б|д|ф|ц|ч|ш|з|ж)
!! # N38 = stem ending in CC and (бь|дь|фь|ць|чь|шь|зь|жь|рь)
!! # N29 = stem ending in CC and (щ)

!! Stems with syncopating vowel
!! # N4311 = syncopating stems ending in -ыг
!! # N4321 = syncopating stems ending in -иг
!! # N4331 = syncopating stems ending in -ыӈ
!! # N4341 = syncopating stems ending in -иӈ
!! # N4411 = syncopating stems ending in -ыл
!! # N4421 = syncopating stems ending in -ил
!! # N4431 = syncopating stems ending in -ын
!! # N4441 = syncopating stems ending in -ин
!! # N4511 = syncopating stems ending in -ум
!! # N4521 = syncopating stems ending in -ым
!! # N4531 = syncopating stems ending in -уп
!! # N4611 = syncopating stems ending in -ыр
!! # N4621 = syncopating stems ending in -ир
!! # N4711 = syncopating stems ending in -ых
!! # N4721 = syncopating stems ending in -их

!! # N53 = irregular paradigm of хум


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON _N01

 ! non possessive forms
 
+N+Sg+Nom: K ;
+N+Sg+Loc:т K ;
+N+Sg+Lat:н K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:ныл K ;
+N+Sg+Instr:л K ;
+N+Sg+Trans:г K ;

+N+Du+Nom:г K ;
+N+Du+Loc:гт K ;
+N+Du+Lat:гн K ;
+N+Du+Abl:гныл K ;
+N+Du+Instr:гтыл K ;

+N+Pl+Nom:т K ;
+N+Pl+Loc:тт K ;
+N+Pl+Lat:тн K ;

+N+Pl+Lat:тын K ;
+N+Pl+Abl:тныл K ;
+N+Pl+Instr:тыл K ;

 ! possessive forms

+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom:м K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc:мт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat:мн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl:мныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Instr:мтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom:гум K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc:гумт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat:гумн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Abl:гумныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Instr:гумтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom:нум K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc:нумт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat:нумн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl:нумныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Instr:нумтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom:н K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc:нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat:нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl:нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Instr:нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom:гын K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc:гынт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat:гынн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Abl:гынныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Instr:гынтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:н K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:нын K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:нынт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:нынн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:нынныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:нынтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom:тэ K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc:тэт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat:тэн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl:тэныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Instr:тэтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom:ге K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc:гет K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat:ген K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Abl:геныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Instr:гетыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom:нэ K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc:нэт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat:нэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl:нэныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Instr:нэтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom:ме̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc:ме̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat:ме̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Abl:ме̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Instr:ме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom:гме̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc:гме̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat:гме̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Abl:гме̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Instr:гме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom:нме̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc:нме̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat:нме̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Abl:нме̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Instr:нме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom:н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc:нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat:нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Abl:нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Instr:нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom:гы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc:гы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat:гы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Abl:гы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Instr:гы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:ны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:ны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:ны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:ны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:ны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom:тэ̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc:тэ̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat:тэ̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Abl:тэ̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Instr:тэ̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom:ге̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc:ге̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat:ге̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Abl:ге̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Instr:ге̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom:нэ̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc:нэ̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat:нэ̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Abl:нэ̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Instr:нэ̄нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom:в K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc:вт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat:вн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl:вныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Instr:втыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom:гув K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc:гувт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat:гувн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Abl:гувныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Instr:гувтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom:нув K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc:нувт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat:нувн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl:нувныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Instr:нувтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom:̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc:̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat:̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl:̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Instr:̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom:гы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc:гы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat:гы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Abl:гы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Instr:гы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:ны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:ны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:ны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:ны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:ны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:н K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom:ныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc:нылт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat:нылн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl:нылныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Instr:нылтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom:га̄ныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc:га̄нылт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat:га̄нылн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Abl:га̄нылныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Instr:га̄нылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:наныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:нанылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:нанылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:нанылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:нанылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:̄ныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:̄нылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:̄нылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:̄нылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:̄нылтыл K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
