src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
автомашина:автомашина	_N01	"автомашина" ;
азбука:азбука	_N01	"азбука /учебник/" ;
а̄кве̄ква:а̄кве̄ква	_N01	"бабушка//старуха" ;
акула:акула	_N01	"акула" ;
ала:ала	_N01	"крыша" ;
ане̄ква:ане̄ква	_N01	"бабушка /по материнскоц линии/" ;
аня:аня	_N01	"наряд//украшение" ;
аня:аня	_N01	"стадо//стая" ;
а̄ӈха:а̄ӈха	_N01	"куропатка" ;
а̄па:а̄па	_N01	"люлька" ;
армия:армия	_N01	"армия" ;
артерия:артерия	_N01	"артерия" ;
атака:атака	_N01	"приступ" ;
а̄щёйка:а̄щёйка	_N01	"дедушка /отец матери/" ;
ащирма:ащирма	_N01	"холод//мороз" ;
баклага:баклага	_N01	"баклага" ;
баня:баня	_N01	"баня" ;
бахча:бахча	_N01	"бахча" ;
белуха:белуха	_N01	"белуха /полярный дельфин/" ;
биография:биография	_N01	"биография" ;
борона:борона	_N01	"борона" ;
бригада:бригада	_N01	"бригада" ;
брошюра:брошюра	_N01	"брошюра" ;
булка:булка	_N01	"булка" ;
ванна:ванна	_N01	"ванна" ;
ва̄та:ва̄та	_N01	"край" ;
ве̄ска:ве̄ска	_N01	"весы" ;
веялка:веялка	_N01	"веялка" ;
витвоӈха:витвоӈха	_N01	"прорубь" ;
вобла:вобла	_N01	"вобла" ;
воззвание:воззвание	_N01	"воззвание" ;
во̄ӈха:во̄ӈха	_N01	"берлога" ;
во̄ӈха:во̄ӈха	_N01	"нора" ;
во̄рупнэ:во̄рупнэ	_N01	"ронжа//кедровка" ;
вывеска:вывеска	_N01	"вывеска" ;
гадюка:гадюка	_N01	"гадюка" ;
галка:галка	_N01	"галка" ;
гидроэлектростанция:гидроэлектростанция	_N01	"гидроэлектростанция" ;
гимнастика:гимнастика	_N01	"гимнастический" ;
гостиница:гостиница	_N01	"гостиница" ;
граната:граната	_N01	"граната" ;
гробница:гробница	_N01	"гробница" ;
дача:дача	_N01	"дача" ;
демонстрация:демонстрация	_N01	"демонстрация" ;
диктовка:диктовка	_N01	"диктовка" ;
долото:долото	_N01	"долото" ;
дружба:дружба	_N01	"дружба" ;
дуга:дуга	_N01	"дуга" ;
е̄ртыщма:е̄ртыщма	_N01	"ненастье" ;
железа:железа	_N01	"железа" ;
заведение:заведение	_N01	"заведение" ;
задача:задача	_N01	"задача" ;
зарядка:зарядка	_N01	"зарядка" ;
застава:застава	_N01	"застава" ;
звезда:звезда	_N01	"звезда" ;
звено:звено	_N01	"звено /пионерское/" ;
зерно:зерно	_N01	"зерно" ;
иволга:иволга	_N01	"иволга" ;
инициатива:инициатива	_N01	"инициатива /начинание/" ;
исве̄ща:исве̄ща	_N01	"свечка" ;
история:история	_N01	"история /повествование/" ;
казарма:казарма	_N01	"казарма" ;
канпе̄тка:канпе̄тка	_N01	"конфета" ;
ка̄рта:ка̄рта	_N01	"ограда" ;
картина:картина	_N01	"картина /произведение живописи/" ;
касса:касса	_N01	"касса" ;
каторга:каторга	_N01	"каторга" ;
каша:каша	_N01	"каша" ;
кино:кино	_N01	"кино /кинематография/" ;
кирка:кирка	_N01	"кайло" ;
кисточка:кисточка	_N01	"кисть /для крашения//рисования/" ;
кнопка:кнопка	_N01	"кнопка /для включения электрического тока/" ;
ко̄йка:ко̄йка	_N01	"кровать" ;
кола̄ла:кола̄ла	_N01	"потолок" ;
коллекция:коллекция	_N01	"коллекция" ;
колхозница:колхозница	_N01	"колхозница" ;
команда:команда	_N01	"команда" ;
конница:конница	_N01	"конница" ;
конфета:конфета	_N01	"конфета" ;
коса:коса	_N01	"коса /узкая полоса земли//отмель/" ;
кофта:кофта	_N01	"кофта" ;
кровообращение:кровообращение	_N01	"кровообращение" ;
куница:куница	_N01	"куница" ;
курыска:курыска	_N01	"кружка" ;
ла̄мпа:ла̄мпа	_N01	"лампа" ;
лекция:лекция	_N01	"лекция" ;
липа:липа	_N01	"липа" ;
лотерея:лотерея	_N01	"лотерея" ;
ма̄:ма̄	_N01	"земля" ;
ма̄йка:ма̄йка	_N01	"майка" ;
марка:марка	_N01	"марка /почтовая/" ;
машина:машина	_N01	"машина" ;
метро:метро	_N01	"метро" ;
мобилизовайтаӈкве:мобилизовайтаӈкве	_N01	"мобилизовать" ;
мӯйлупса:мӯйлупса	_N01	"дар" ;
навага:навага	_N01	"навага" ;
незабудка:незабудка	_N01	"незабудка" ;
но̄щилка:но̄щилка	_N01	"носилки" ;
обезьяна:обезьяна	_N01	"обезьяна" ;
объявление:объявление	_N01	"объявление" ;
о̄йка:о̄йка	_N01	"мужчина" ;
о̄лупса:о̄лупса	_N01	"быт" ;
осада:осада	_N01	"осада" ;
ощщалэ̄гпа:ощщалэ̄гпа	_N01	"ящерица" ;
па̄ля:па̄ля	_N01	"овца" ;
пасека:пасека	_N01	"пасека" ;
печенье:печенье	_N01	"печенье" ;
пирка̄та:пирка̄та	_N01	"бригада" ;
плотина:плотина	_N01	"плотина" ;
польза:польза	_N01	"корысть" ;
пора:пора	_N01	"пора /время/" ;
портниха:портниха	_N01	"портниха" ;
почта:почта	_N01	"почта" ;
право:право	_N01	"право /возможность/" ;
природа:природа	_N01	"природа /всё существующее в мире//не созданное человеком/" ;
пропаганда:пропаганда	_N01	"пропаганда" ;
пӯмащипа:пӯмащипа	_N01	"спасибо" ;
пӯтпӯльна:пӯтпӯльна	_N01	"подполье /полит/ /помещение/" ;
пшеница:пшеница	_N01	"пшеница" ;
радиограмма:радиограмма	_N01	"радиограмма" ;
расписание:расписание	_N01	"расписание" ;
республика:республика	_N01	"республика /государственный строй/" ;
рума:рума	_N01	"товарищ /другой национальности/" ;
са̄мкве:са̄мкве	_N01	"уголок /угол/" ;
свёкла:свёкла	_N01	"свёкла" ;
слива:слива	_N01	"слива" ;
созвездие:созвездие	_N01	"созвездие" ;
справка:справка	_N01	"справка" ;
статья:статья	_N01	"статья /глава//раздел/" ;
строчка:строчка	_N01	"строка" ;
сумка:сумка	_N01	"сумка" ;
таблица:таблица	_N01	"таблица" ;
телеграмма:телеграмма	_N01	"телеграмма" ;
то̄рум-ма̄:то̄рум-ма̄	_N01	"вселенная /вся земля//все страны/" ;
трахома:трахома	_N01	"трахома" ;
тумбочка:тумбочка	_N01	"тумбочка" ;
тӯя:тӯя	_N01	"весна / весенний" ;
ӯльпа:ӯльпа	_N01	"кедр" ;
ӯсма:ӯсма	_N01	"сеть" ;
фанера:фанера	_N01	"фанера" ;
форма:форма	_N01	"форма /образец/" ;
фуфайка:фуфайка	_N01	"фуфайка" ;
харама:харама	_N01	"поле" ;
хо̄хра:хо̄хра	_N01	"дятел" ;
цапля:цапля	_N01	"цапля" ;
черепаха:черепаха	_N01	"черепаха" ;
шарада:шарада	_N01	"шарада" ;
школа:школа	_N01	"школа" ;
щаще̄ква:щаще̄ква	_N01	"бабушка /мать отца/" ;
щёмга:щёмга	_N01	"сёмга" ;
щё̄тка:щё̄тка	_N01	"щётка" ;
э̄ква:э̄ква	_N01	"женщина" ;
энергия:энергия	_N01	"энергия /у человека - решительность//настойчивость/" ;
э̄сырма:э̄сырма	_N01	"стыд" ;
я̄:я̄	_N01	"река" ;
